Hawaii statutes.
[§577-16.5] Sentencing for the
violation of curfew. In addition to any other penalties established by
law, rule, or ordinance in the State, any child found in violation of section
577-16 and their parents or guardians may be required to participate in such
counseling, as the court deems to be appropriate in each case. [L 1991, c 330,
§2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next